Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 14 Miscellaneous Offenses

46-8-380.
Intruding on railroad tracks.

Any person intruding unlawfully upon the constructed track of a railroad company, contrary to the will of the company, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1837; Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 850; Code 1863, § 4334; Code 1868, § 4370; Code 1873, § 4437; Ga. L. 1875, p. 26, § 1; Code 1882, § 4437; Penal Code 1895, § 519; Penal Code 1910, § 521; Code 1933, § 94-9908.

46-8-381.
Hiding on train for purpose of stealing a ride.

Any person who rides or attempts to ride on a railroad train of any character and conceals himself from the conductor or train authorities by hiding under the train, or on top of the train, or in box cars, on tenders, or elsewhere, for the purpose of avoiding the payment of fare or of stealing a ride thereon, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1897, p. 116, §§ 1, 2; Penal Code 1910, § 717; Code 1933, § 18-9912.

46-8-382.
Neglect or refusal of officer, agent, or employee of railroad company to make and furnish report required by commission; obstructing commission.

Every officer, agent, or employee of any railroad company who willfully neglects or refuses to make and furnish any report required by the commission, as necessary to the purposes of this title, or who willfully and unlawfully hinders, delays, or obstructs the commission in the discharge of the duties imposed upon it by this title, shall be subject to a penalty of not less than $100.00 nor more than $5,000.00 for each offense, to be recovered in an action in the name of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 16; Code 1882, § 719p; Civil Code 1895, § 2211; Civil Code 1910, § 2654; Code 1933, § 93-401.